Hawaii statutes.
§87A-24 Other powers. In addition to
the power to administer the fund, the board may:

(1) Collect, receive, deposit, and withdraw money on
behalf of the fund;

(2) Invest moneys in the same manner specified in section
88-119;

(3) Hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or
dispose of any securities or other investments of the fund, as well as the
proceeds of those investments and any money belonging to the fund;

(4) Appoint, and at pleasure dismiss, an
administrator and other fund staff. The administrator and staff shall be
exempt from chapter 76 and shall serve under and at the pleasure of the board;

(5) Make payments of periodic charges and pay for
reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out the purposes of the fund;

(6) Contract for the performance of financial audits
of the fund and claims audits of its insurance carriers;

(7) Retain auditors, actuaries, investment firms and
managers, benefit plan consultants, or other professional advisors to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including the retaining of an actuary to
determine the annual required public employer contribution for the separate
trust fund established under section 87A-42;

(8) Establish health benefits plan and long-term care
benefits plan rates that include administrative and other expenses necessary to
effectuate the purposes of the fund; and

(9) Require any department, agency, or employee of
the State or counties to furnish information to the board to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 216, §15; am L
2013, c 268, §7; am L 2016, c 30, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next